Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated to the Psychiatric Security Review  Board, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2017, out of the General Fund, the amount of $2,999,554.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount  of $2,248
is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and in-
cluding federal grant funds received,  but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not de-
scribed in this section, collected or received by the Psychiatric Security Review Board.
SECTION 3.
This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2017 Act takes effect
July 1, 2017.
Passed by House May 30, 2017
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 7, 2017
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5032 (HB 5032-A) Page 1